New York, session 2025-2026, S7267.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 2-a of section 238 of the 2 vehicle and traffic law, as added by chapter 224 of the laws of 1995, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (b) If any information which is required to be inserted on a notice of 5 violation is omitted from the notice of violation, misdescribed, or 6 illegible, the violation shall be dismissed [upon application of the 7 person charged with the violation]. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 9 have become a law and shall apply to notices of violation issued on and 10 after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05495-01-5